Massachusetts, session 194th, H2728.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 35SSS the following section:
Section 35TTT. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth
a separate fund to be known as the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial Fund to be used
without appropriation by a department of public safety for the purpose of making annual
payments to the Massachusetts Law Enforcement Memorial to memorialize and honor
Massachusetts law enforcement personnel killed in the line of duty. There shall be credited to the
fund revenues received by the commonwealth from the sale of registration plates under section
2G of chapter 90.
of 1